Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.090

Contracts with community colleges—Enrollment lid—Fees.

The community colleges are encouraged to contract with skill centers to use the skill center facilities. The community colleges shall not be required to count the enrollments under these agreements toward the community college enrollment lid. Skill centers may charge fees to adult students under RCW 28A.225.220.

[ 1993 c 380 s 3. Formerly RCW 28C.22.020.]